apertium-en-mt.mt.metadix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÀàBbCcĊċDdEeFfGgĠġHhĦħIiJjKkLlMmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuVvWwXxYyZzŻżÁÉÍÓÚÜáéíóúÈÌÒÙèìòùü</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="perf"/>
    <sdef n="imperf"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="neg"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="cnt"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l><r/></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aktar__preadv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jekk__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="illum__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fejn__adv">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="min__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kontra__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l-__det">
      <e><p><l>l-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>il-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iċ-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>id-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ix-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iz-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iż-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tal-__pr+det">
      <e><p><l>l-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċ-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>x-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>z-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ż-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għall-__pr+det">
      <e><p><l>ll-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċ-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>d-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>t-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>x-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>z-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ż-</l><r>l<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tagħha__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prnsubj__prn">
      <e><p><l>jien</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jiena</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>inti</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hu</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>huwa</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>hija</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aħna</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intom</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>huma</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="li__rel">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xi__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ewwel__det">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/an__det">
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awn</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awn</l><r>an<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ak__det">
      <e><p><l>ak</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ik</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awk</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>awk</l><r>ak<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ieħor__det">
      <e><p><l>ieħor</l><r>ieħor<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oħra</l><r>ieħor<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oħrajn</l><r>ieħor<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oħrajn</l><r>ieħor<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pikkanti__adj">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="teknoloġi/ku__adj">
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċi</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċi</l><r>ku<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tielet"><i>tielet</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ħames"><i>ħames</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="seba'"><i>seba'</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="disa'"><i>disa'</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tlettax"><i>tlettax</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="sbatax"><i>sbatax</i><par n="ewwel__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><i>d</i><par n="d/an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dak"><i>d</i><par n="d/ak__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ieħor"><i></i><par n="/ieħor__det"/></e>
    <e lm="jekk"><i>jekk</i><par n="jekk__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kieku"><i>kieku</i><par n="jekk__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="meta"><i>meta</i><par n="jekk__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kif ukoll"><i>kif<b/>ukoll</i><par n="jekk__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="hekk"><i>hekk</i><par n="jekk__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="aktar"><i>aktar</i><par n="aktar__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ħafna"><i>ħafna</i><par n="aktar__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tipikament"><i>tipikament</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dejjem"><i>dejjem</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="il-lejl li għadda"><i>il-lejl<b/>li<b/>għadda</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="issa"><i>issa</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mbagħad"><i>mbagħad</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="spiss"><i>spiss</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="probabilment"><i>probabilment</i><par n="illum__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="min"><i>min</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="xiex"><i>xiex</i><par n="min__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="fejn"><i>fejn</i><par n="fejn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="għaliex"><i>għaliex</i><par n="fejn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kif"><i>kif</i><par n="fejn__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prnsubj"><i></i><par n="prnsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħha"><i>tagħha</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tiegħek"><i>tiegħek</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħhom"><i>tagħhom</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħkom"><i>tagħkom</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tagħna"><i>tagħna</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tiegħi"><i>tiegħi</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="tiegħu"><i>tiegħu</i><par n="tagħha__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="u"><i>u</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="jew"><i>jew</i><par n="u__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="minn"><i>minn</i><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="wara"><i>wara</i><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fi" r="LR"><i>fi</i><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ma'" r="RL"><p><l><a/>ma'</l><r>ma'</r></p><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sa" r="RL"><p><l><a/>sa</l><r>sa</r></p><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="li"><i>li</i><par n="li__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="xi" r="LR"><i>xi</i><par n="xi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="xi" r="RL"><p><l><a/>xi</l><r>xi</r></p><par n="xi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="pikkanti"><i>pikkanti</i><par n="pikkanti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="militari"><i>militari</i><par n="pikkanti__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="politiku"><i>politi</i><par n="teknoloġi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teknoloġiku"><i>teknoloġi</i><par n="teknoloġi/ku__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="xi" r="LR"><p><l>x'</l><r>xi</r></p><par n="xi__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ta'" r="LR"><p><l>t'</l><r>ta'</r></p><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ma'" r="LR"><i>ma'</i><par n="kontra__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="l" r="LR"><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="fil" r="LR"><p><l>f</l><r>fi<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="bil" r="LR"><p><l>b</l><r>bi<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="l-__det"/></e>
    <e lm="tal" r="LR"><p><l>ta</l><r>ta'<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="tal-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="mal" r="LR"><p><l>ma</l><r>ma'<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="tal-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="sal" r="LR"><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="tal-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="għall" r="LR"><p><l>għa</l><r>għal<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="għall-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="mill" r="LR"><p><l>mi</l><r>minn<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="għall-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="lill" r="LR"><p><l>li</l><r>lil<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="għall-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e lm="ħlief għall" r="LR"><p><l>ħlief<b/>għa</l><r>ħlief<b/>għal<s n="pr"/><j/></r></p><par n="għall-__pr+det"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
